District of Columbia statutes.
42-1902.19

Expansion of condominiums; amendment of declaration; recordation; reallocation of interests in common elements.

No condominium shall be expanded except in accordance with the provisions of the declaration and of this chapter. Any such expansion shall be deemed to have occurred at the time of the recordation of plats and plans pursuant to § 42-1902.14(c) and the recordation of an amendment to the declaration, duly executed by the declarant, including, without limitation, all of the owners and lessees of the additional land added to the condominium. Such amendment shall contain a legally sufficient description of the land added to the condominium, and shall reallocate undivided interests in the common elements in accordance with the provisions of § 42-1902.12(b). Such amendment may create convertible or withdrawable lands within the land added to the condominium, but this provision shall not be construed in derogation of the time limits imposed by or pursuant to §§ 42-1902.10(d)(3) and 42-1902.17(c).

Mar. 29, 1977, D.C. Law 1-89, title II, § 219, 23 DCR 9532b
This section is referenced in § 42-1901.02, § 42-1902.04, and § 42-1902.15.
1981 Ed., § 45-1829.
1973 Ed., § 5-1229.